Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB46.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 154A IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) For purposes of this section, "publish" means to issue information or material in
printed or electronic form for distribution to the public, including a response to a
request for release of information pursuant to KRS 154A.040.
(2) Any winner of a lottery prize with an overall gross value that exceeds one million
dollars ($1,000,000) shall have his or her name and likeness withheld from public
record for not more than one (1) year from the date of the prize claim unless the
winner elects to waive his or her confidentiality on forms prescribed by the
corporation.
(3) (a) The corporation, its board of directors, or its employees shall not publish
the name or likeness of any winner whose individual share of a lottery prize
exceeds one million dollars ($1,000,000) unless the individual elects to
waive the confidentiality of his or her identifying information pursuant to
this section.
(b) Information regarding the retail location from which the ticket was
purchased and information that is not personally identifiable information of
the individual prize winner may be published and shall not be confidential.
(4) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the corporation from sharing information
with other state or federal agencies as authorized or required by subsection (5) of
Section 3 of this Act and other applicable laws, or as required by court order or
other legal process. This section shall not be construed to prevent an authorized
agency from collecting data pursuant to subsection (5) of Section 3 of this Act.
Section 2. KRS 154A.040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) All records of the corporation shall be deemed open records and subject to public
Page 1 of 9
BR031200.100 - 312 - XXXX 2/26/2025 4:58 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 312
inspection, unless:
(a) The record is excluded from inspection under KRS 61.870 to 61.884 under
KRS 61.878;
(b) The record involves a trade secret or other legally-protectable intellectual
property or confidential proprietary information of the corporation or of a
vendor;[ or]
(c) The disclosure of the record could impair or adversely impact the security of
the corporation in the operation of the lottery or the security of lottery
retailers; or
(d) The record identifies a winner of a lottery prize who has won a prize with an
overall gross value that exceeds one million dollars ($1,000,000) within one
(1) year of the date of the request for public inspection and the winner has
not elected to waive confidentiality in accordance with Section 1 of this Act.
(2) The provisions of KRS 61.878, 61.880, and 61.884 shall apply to records of the
lottery corporation with the exception that the only Circuit Court with jurisdiction
over the records of the lottery corporation is the Circuit Court in the county where
the corporate headquarters of the lottery corporation is located.
Section 3. KRS 61.878 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The following public records are excluded from the application of KRS 61.870 to
61.884 and shall be subject to inspection only upon order of a court of competent
jurisdiction, except that no court shall authorize the inspection by any party of any
materials pertaining to civil litigation beyond that which is provided by the Rules of
Civil Procedure governing pretrial discovery:
(a) Public records containing information of a personal nature where the public
disclosure thereof would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal
privacy;
(b) Records confidentially disclosed to an agency and compiled and maintained
Page 2 of 9
BR031200.100 - 312 - XXXX 2/26/2025 4:58 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 312
for scientific research. This exemption shall not, however, apply to records the
disclosure or publication of which is directed by another statute;
(c) 1. Records confidentially disclosed to an agency or required by an agency
to be disclosed to it, generally recognized as confidential or proprietary,
which if openly disclosed would permit an unfair commercial advantage
to competitors of the entity that disclosed the records;
2. Records confidentially disclosed to an agency or required by an agency
to be disclosed to it, generally recognized as confidential or proprietary,
which are compiled and maintained:
a. In conjunction with an application for or the administration of a
loan or grant;
b. In conjunction with an application for or the administration of
assessments, incentives, inducements, and tax credits as described
in KRS Chapter 154;
c. In conjunction with the regulation of commercial enterprise,
including mineral exploration records, unpatented, secret
commercially valuable plans, appliances, formulae, or processes,
which are used for the making, preparing, compounding, treating,
or processing of articles or materials which are trade commodities
obtained from a person; or
d. For the grant or review of a license to do business.
3. The exemptions provided for in subparagraphs 1. and 2. of this
paragraph shall not apply to records the disclosure or publication of
which is directed by another statute;
(d) Public records pertaining to a prospective location of a business or industry
where no previous public disclosure has been made of the business' or
industry's interest in locating in, relocating within or expanding within the
Page 3 of 9
BR031200.100 - 312 - XXXX 2/26/2025 4:58 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 312
Commonwealth. This exemption shall not include those records pertaining to
application to agencies for permits or licenses necessary to do business or to
expand business operations within the state, except as provided in paragraph
(c) of this subsection;
(e) Public records which are developed by an agency in conjunction with the
regulation or supervision of financial institutions, including but not limited to
banks, savings and loan associations, and credit unions, which disclose the
agency's internal examining or audit criteria and related analytical methods;
(f) The contents of real estate appraisals, engineering or feasibility estimates and
evaluations made by or for a public agency relative to acquisition of property,
until such time as all of the property has been acquired. The law of eminent
domain shall not be affected by this provision;
(g) Test questions, scoring keys, and other examination data used to administer a
licensing examination, examination for employment, or academic
examination before the exam is given or if it is to be given again;
(h) Records of law enforcement agencies or agencies involved in administrative
adjudication that were compiled in the process of detecting and investigating
statutory or regulatory violations if the disclosure of the information would
harm the agency by revealing the identity of informants not otherwise known
or by premature release of information to be used in a prospective law
enforcement action or administrative adjudication. Unless exempted by other
provisions of KRS 61.870 to 61.884, public records exempted under this
provision shall be open after enforcement action is completed or a decision is
made to take no action; however, records or information compiled and
maintained by county attorneys or Commonwealth's attorneys pertaining to
criminal investigations or criminal litigation shall be exempted from the
provisions of KRS 61.870 to 61.884 and shall remain exempted after
Page 4 of 9
BR031200.100 - 312 - XXXX 2/26/2025 4:58 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 312
enforcement action, including litigation, is completed or a decision is made to
take no action. The exemptions provided by this subsection shall not be used
by the custodian of the records to delay or impede the exercise of rights
granted by KRS 61.870 to 61.884;
(i) Preliminary drafts, notes, correspondence with private individuals, other than
correspondence which is intended to give notice of final action of a public
agency;
(j) Preliminary recommendations, and preliminary memoranda in which opinions
are expressed or policies formulated or recommended;
(k) All public records or information the disclosure of which is prohibited by
federal law or regulation or state law;
(l) Public records or information the disclosure of which is prohibited or
restricted or otherwise made confidential by enactment of the General
Assembly, including any information acquired by the Department of Revenue
in tax administration that is prohibited from divulgence or disclosure under
KRS 131.190;
(m) 1. Public records the disclosure of which would have a reasonable
likelihood of threatening the public safety by exposing a vulnerability in
preventing, protecting against, mitigating, or responding to a terrorist act
and limited to:
a. Criticality lists resulting from consequence assessments;
b. Vulnerability assessments;
c. Antiterrorism protective measures and plans;
d. Counterterrorism measures and plans;
e. Security and response needs assessments;
f. Infrastructure records that expose a vulnerability referred to in this
subparagraph through the disclosure of the location, configuration,
Page 5 of 9
BR031200.100 - 312 - XXXX 2/26/2025 4:58 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 312
or security of critical systems, including public utility critical
systems. These critical systems shall include but not be limited to
information technology, communication, electrical, fire
suppression, ventilation, water, wastewater, sewage, and gas
systems;
g. The following records when their disclosure will expose a
vulnerability referred to in this subparagraph: detailed drawings,
schematics, maps, or specifications of structural elements, floor
plans, and operating, utility, or security systems of any building or
facility owned, occupied, leased, or maintained by a public
agency; and
h. Records when their disclosure will expose a vulnerability referred
to in this subparagraph and that describe the exact physical
location of hazardous chemical, radiological, or biological
materials.
2. As used in this paragraph, "terrorist act" means a criminal act intended
to:
a. Intimidate or coerce a public agency or all or part of the civilian
population;
b. Disrupt a system identified in subparagraph 1.f. of this paragraph;
or
c. Cause massive destruction to a building or facility owned,
occupied, leased, or maintained by a public agency.
3. On the same day that a public agency denies a request to inspect a public
record for a reason identified in this paragraph, that public agency shall
forward a copy of the written denial of the request, referred to in KRS
61.880(1), to the executive director of the Kentucky Office of Homeland
Page 6 of 9
BR031200.100 - 312 - XXXX 2/26/2025 4:58 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 312
Security and the Attorney General.
4. Nothing in this paragraph shall affect the obligations of a public agency
with respect to disclosure and availability of public records under state
environmental, health, and safety programs.
5. The exemption established in this paragraph shall not apply when a
member of the Kentucky General Assembly seeks to inspect a public
record identified in this paragraph under the Open Records Law;
(n) Public or private records, including books, papers, maps, photographs, cards,
tapes, discs, diskettes, recordings, software, or other documentation regardless
of physical form or characteristics, having historic, literary, artistic, or
commemorative value accepted by the archivist of a public university,
museum, or government depository from a donor or depositor other than a
public agency. This exemption shall apply to the extent that nondisclosure is
requested in writing by the donor or depositor of such records, but shall not
apply to records the disclosure or publication of which is mandated by another
statute or by federal law;
(o) Records of a procurement process under KRS Chapter 45A or 56. This
exemption shall not apply after:
1. A contract is awarded; or
2. The procurement process is canceled without award of a contract and
there is a determination that the contract will not be resolicited;
(p) Client and case files maintained by the Department of Public Advocacy or any
person or entity contracting with the Department of Public Advocacy for the
provision of legal representation under KRS Chapter 31;
(q) Except as provided in KRS 61.168, photographs or videos that depict the
death, killing, rape, or sexual assault of a person. However, such photographs
or videos shall be made available by the public agency to the requesting party
Page 7 of 9
BR031200.100 - 312 - XXXX 2/26/2025 4:58 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 312
for viewing on the premises of the public agency, or a mutually agreed upon
location, at the request of;
1. a. Any victim depicted in the photographs or videos, his or her
immediate family, or legal representative;
b. Any involved insurance company or its representative; or
c. The legal representative of any involved party;
2. Any state agency or political subdivision investigating official
misconduct; or
3. A legal representative for a person under investigation for, charged with,
pled guilty to, or found guilty of a crime related to the underlying
incident. The person under investigation for, charged with, pled guilty
to, or found guilty of a crime related to the underlying incident or their
immediate family shall not be permitted to have access to the
photographs or videos;
(r) Records confidentially maintained by a law enforcement agency in
accordance with a wellness program, including an early intervention system,
as described in KRS 15.409;[ and]
(s) Communications of a purely personal nature unrelated to any governmental
function; and
(t) For a period of not more than one (1) year, the name, address, or likeness
of the winner of a lottery prize with an overall gross value that exceeds one
million dollars ($1,000,000), unless the prize winner elects to waive
confidentiality on forms prescribed by the Kentucky Lottery Corporation
pursuant to Section 1 of this Act.
(2) No exemption in this section shall be construed to prohibit disclosure of statistical
information not descriptive of any readily identifiable person.
(3) No exemption in this section shall be construed to deny, abridge, or impede the
Page 8 of 9
BR031200.100 - 312 - XXXX 2/26/2025 4:58 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 312
right of a public agency employee, including university employees, an applicant for
employment, or an eligible on a register to inspect and to copy any record including
preliminary and other supporting documentation that relates to him or her. The
records shall include but not be limited to work plans, job performance, demotions,
evaluations, promotions, compensation, classification, reallocation, transfers, lay-
offs, disciplinary actions, examination scores, and preliminary and other supporting
documentation. A public agency employee, including university employees,
applicant, or eligible shall not have the right to inspect or to copy any examination
or any documents relating to ongoing criminal or administrative investigations by
an agency.
(4) If any public record contains material which is not excepted under this section, the
public agency shall separate the excepted and make the nonexcepted material
available for examination.
(5) The provisions of this section shall in no way prohibit or limit the exchange of
public records or the sharing of information between public agencies when the
exchange is serving a legitimate governmental need or is necessary in the
performance of a legitimate government function.
(6) When material is made available pursuant to a request under subsection (1)(q) of
this section, the public agency shall not be required to make a copy of the recording
except as provided in KRS 61.169, and the requesting parties shall not be limited in
the number of times they may view the material.
Page 9 of 9
BR031200.100 - 312 - XXXX 2/26/2025 4:58 PM Jacketed